Utah statutes.
41-1a-1316.   Receiving or transferring stolen motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer -- Penalty.

It is a second degree felony for a person:

(1)  with intent to procure or pass title to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that he knows or has reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken to receive or transfer possession of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer from or to another; or

(2)  to have in his possession any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that he knows or has reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken if he is not a peace officer engaged at the time in the performance of his duty.

